Utah statutes.
38-9-2.   Scope.

(1) (a)  The provisions of Sections 38-9-1, 38-9-3, 38-9-4, and 38-9-6 apply to any recording or filing or any rejected recording or filing of a lien pursuant to this chapter on or after May 5, 1997.

(b)  The provisions of Sections 38-9-1 and 38-9-7 apply to all liens of record regardless of the date the lien was recorded or filed.

(c)  Notwithstanding Subsections (1)(a) and (b), the provisions of this chapter applicable to the filing of a notice of interest do not apply to a notice of interest filed before May 5, 2008.

(2)  The provisions of this chapter shall not prevent a person from filing a lis pendens in accordance with Section 78B-6-1303 or seeking any other relief permitted by law.

(3)  This chapter does not apply to a person entitled to a preconstruction or construction lien under Section 38-1a-301 who files a lien pursuant to Title 38, Chapter 1a, Preconstruction and Construction.

